Utah statutes.
11-49-301.   Authority to review complaint -- Grounds for complaint -- Limitations on filings.

(1)  Subject to the requirements of this chapter and Section 10-3-1311 or 17-16a-11, the commission is authorized to review an ethics complaint against a political subdivision officer or employee if the complaint alleges:

(a)  if the applicable political subdivision is a municipality, an ethics violation of Title 10, Chapter 3, Part 13, Municipal Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act by:

(i)  a city manager or non-elected chief executive; or

(ii)  an elected officer, as defined in Section 10-3-1303;

(b)  if the applicable political subdivision is a county, an ethics violation of Title 17, Chapter 16a, County Officers and Employees Disclosure Act by:

(i)  an appointed officer, as defined in Section 17-16a-3;

(ii)  an elected officer, as defined in Section 17-16a-3; or

(iii)  an employee subject to Title 17, Chapter 16a, County Officers and Employees Disclosure Act; or

(c)  for a political subdivision officer or employee other than a municipal officer or employee described in Subsection (1)(a) or a county officer or employee described in Subsection (1)(b), an ethics violation of Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act.

(2)  A complaint described in Subsection (1) shall be filed in accordance with the time limit provisions, if any, of the applicable part or chapter.

(3) (a)  A complaint may not contain an allegation if that allegation and the general facts and circumstances supporting that allegation have been previously reviewed by a municipal ethics commission established under Section 10-3-1311, a county ethics commission established under Section 17-16a-11, or a local political subdivision ethics commission established under Section 11-49-103, as applicable, or the commission unless:

(i)  the allegation was previously reviewed and dismissed by the commission under Section 11-49-602 or 11-49-701;

(ii)  the allegation is accompanied by material facts or circumstances supporting the allegation that were not raised or pled to the commission; and

(iii)  the allegation and the general facts and circumstances supporting that allegation have only been reviewed by the commission in accordance with Section 11-49-701 on one previous occasion.

(b)  The commission may not review a complaint that is currently before:

(i)  a municipal ethics commission established under Section 10-3-1311;

(ii)  a county ethics commission established under Section 17-16a-11; or

(iii)  a local political subdivision ethics commission established under Section 11-49-103.

(c)  If an allegation in the complaint does not comply with the requirements of Subsection (3)(a) or (b), the allegation shall be summarily dismissed with prejudice by:

(i)  the chair when reviewing the complaint under Section 11-49-601; or

(ii)  the commission, when reviewing the complaint under Section 11-49-602 or 11-49-701.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

